Hawaii statutes.
[§249-14.2] Procedure when
registration of a bicycle or moped transferred. (a) Upon transfer of
registered ownership in or to a bicycle or moped, the person whose interest is
to be transferred and the transferee shall write their signatures with pen and
ink upon the certificate of registration issued for the bicycle or moped,
together with the address of the transferee in the appropriate space provided
upon the certificate.

(b) Within thirty calendar days of the
transfer of registered ownership of a bicycle or moped, the transferee shall
forward the certificate of registration so endorsed to the director of finance
who shall file the certificate. The director of finance may charge a fee of $5
which shall be deposited into the county bikeway fund for each new certificate
of registration issued. Whenever a transferee fails to comply with these
provisions, the director of finance shall charge a fee of $10, in addition to
the fee provided in this section, for the issuance of a new certificate of
registration.

(c) The director of finance, upon receipt of
the certificate of registration properly endorsed and the required fee, shall
register the bicycle or moped and shall issue to the owner thereof by reason of
the transfer a new certificate of registration in the manner and form provided
for in an original registration.

(d) Until the director of finance has issued
the new certificate of registration as provided in subsection (c), delivery of
such bicycle or moped shall be deemed not to have been made and registration
thereto shall be deemed not to have passed, and the intended transfer shall be
deemed to be incomplete and not to be valid or effective for any purpose.

(e) In the event of the transfer by operation
of law in or to a bicycle or moped, as upon inheritance, devise, or bequest,
order in bankruptcy, or insolvency, execution sale, repossession upon default
in performance of the terms of a lease or executory sales contract, or
otherwise than by the voluntary act of the person whose interest is to be
transferred, the certificate of registration shall be signed upon the spaces
provided by the personal representative of, or successor in interest of the
person whose registered ownership or interest is so transferred in lieu of such
person. Every personal representative, receiver, trustee, sheriff, or other
representative hereinabove referred to shall file with the director of finance
a notice of any transfer by sale, lease, or otherwise by the person, of any
such bicycle or moped, together with evidence satisfactory to the director of
finance of all facts entitling such representative to make the transfer.

(f) Any person who refuses or neglects to
deliver a certificate of registration to a transferee entitled thereto under
this section, shall be punished as provided in section 249-14.6.

(g) Every dealer or manufacturer, upon
transferring a bicycle or moped, whether by sale, lease, or otherwise, shall
immediately give notice of the transfer to the director of finance upon the
official form provided by the director of finance. Every such notice shall
contain the date of the transfer, the names and addresses of the transferor and
transferee, and such description of the bicycle or moped as may be called for
in the official form.

(h) Every person, other than a dealer, upon
transferring a bicycle or moped, whether by sale, lease, or otherwise, shall
within ten days give notice of the transfer to the director of finance upon the
official form provided by the director of finance. Every notice shall contain the
date of transfer, the names and addresses of the transferor and transferee, and
such description of the bicycle or moped as may be called for in the official
form. Any person who violates this subsection shall be fined not more than
$100.

(i) Whenever the registered owner of a bicycle
or moped or any dealer or manufacturer has given notice to the director of
finance of a transfer of the registered ownership to the bicycle or moped, as
provided in subsection (g) or (h), and has delivered the certificate of
registration bearing the transferor's signature to the transferee as required
by subsection (a), the transferor shall be relieved from liability, civil or
criminal, which the transferor might subsequently incur by reason of being the
registered owner of the bicycle or moped.

(j) Any person who falsely or fraudulently
gives notice to the director of finance of a transfer of registered ownership
to a bicycle or moped shall be subject to the penalty provided in section
249-14.6. [L 1998, c 188, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next